Hawaii statutes.
§291E-62 Operating a vehicle after license
and privilege have been suspended or revoked for operating a vehicle under the
influence of an intoxicant; penalties. (a) No person whose license and
privilege to operate a vehicle have been revoked, suspended, or otherwise
restricted pursuant to this section or to part III or section 291E-61 or
291E-61.5, or to part VII or part XIV of chapter 286 or section 200-81, 291-4,
291-4.4, 291-4.5, or 291-7 as those provisions were in effect on December 31,
2001, shall operate or assume actual physical control of any vehicle:

(1) In violation of any restrictions placed on the
person's license;

(2) While the person's license or privilege to
operate a vehicle remains suspended or revoked;

(3) Without installing an ignition interlock device
required by this chapter; or

(4) With an ignition interlock permit unless the
person has the ignition interlock permit and a valid State of Hawaii
identification card in the person's immediate possession.

(b) No person who has been issued a notice of
administrative revocation that serves as a temporary permit by a law
enforcement officer, pursuant to section 291E-33, shall operate or assume
actual physical control of any vehicle after the expiration of the temporary
permit unless that person has an otherwise valid driver's license. No person
charged with violating this section shall be convicted if the person produces
in court, or proves from the proper official or other records, that the person
was the holder of a valid driver's license at the time of the offense.

(c) Any person convicted of violating this
section shall be sentenced as follows without possibility of probation or
suspension of sentence:

(1) For a first offense, or any offense not preceded
within a five-year period by conviction for an offense under this section,
section 291E-66, or section 291-4.5 as that section was in effect on
December 31, 2001:

(A) A term of imprisonment of not less than
three consecutive days but not more than thirty days;

(B) A fine of not less than $250 but not more
than $1,000;

(C) Revocation of license and privilege to
operate a vehicle for an additional year; and

(D) Loss of the privilege to operate a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device, if applicable;

(2) For an offense that occurs within five years of a
prior conviction for an offense under this section, section 291E-66, or section
291-4.5 as that section was in effect on December 31, 2001:

(A) Thirty days imprisonment;

(B) A $1,000 fine;

(C) Revocation of license and privilege to
operate a vehicle for an additional two years; and

(D) Loss of the privilege to operate a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device, if applicable; and

(3) For an offense that occurs within five years of
two or more prior convictions for offenses under this section, section 291E-66,
or section 291-4.5 as that section was in effect on December 31, 2001, or any
combination thereof:

(A) One year imprisonment;

(B) A $2,000 fine;

(C) Permanent revocation of the person's license
and privilege to operate a vehicle; and

(D) Loss of the privilege to operate a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device, if applicable.

(d) The applicable period of revocation in
subsection (c) shall commence upon the release of the person from the period of
imprisonment imposed pursuant to this section. [L 2000, c 189, pt of §23; am L
2001, c 157, §26; am L 2003, c 71, §4; am L 2004, c 6, §1 and c 90, §14; am L
2008, c 171, §9; am L 2009, c 88, §13; am L 2010, c 166, §20; am L 2015, c 40,
§2]

Case Notes

As to the description of the offense, this section, which
relates to operating a vehicle after license and privilege have been suspended
or revoked for operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant,
substantially reenacted §291-4.5, which pertained to driving after license
suspended or revoked for driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor.
107 H. 36, 109 P.3d 677.

Prior qualifying convictions for operating a vehicle after
license and privilege have been suspended or revoked for operating a vehicle
under the influence of an intoxicant, in violation of this section, are an
essential offense element that must be alleged in the charging instrument in
order to impose the enhanced penalties for repeat offenders under this
section. 124 H. 404 (App.), 245 P.3d 477 (2011).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next